Udmurt.aff
SFX j Y 389		# для неодушевленных сущ. оканч-ся на -ие -ия (Россия, предприятие)
SFX j я е ия
SFX j е ед ие
SFX j я ед ия
SFX j е ез ие
SFX j я ез ия
SFX j е мы ие
SFX j я мы ия
SFX j е ды ие
SFX j я ды ия
SFX j е зы ие
SFX j я зы ия
SFX j е ме ие
SFX j я ме ия
SFX j е дэ ие
SFX j я дэ ия
SFX j е дэc ие
SFX j я дэc ия
SFX j е зэ ие
SFX j я зэ ия 
SFX j е зэс ие
SFX j я зэс ия 
SFX j е лэн ие
SFX j я лэн ия
SFX j е елэн ие
SFX j я елэн ия
SFX j е едлэн ие
SFX j я едлэн ия
SFX j е езлэн ие
SFX j я езлэн ия
SFX j е мылэн ие
SFX j я мылэн ия
SFX j е дылэн ие
SFX j я дылэн ия
SFX j е зылэн ие
SFX j я зылэн ия
SFX j е лэсь ие
SFX j я лэсь ия
SFX j е елэсь ие
SFX j я елэсь ия
SFX j е едлэсь ие
SFX j я едлэсь ия
SFX j е езлэсь ие
SFX j я езлэсь ия
SFX j е мылэсь ие
SFX j я мылэсь ия
SFX j е дылэсь ие
SFX j я дылэсь ия
SFX j е зылэсь ие
SFX j я зылэсь ия
SFX j е лы ие
SFX j я лы ия
SFX j е елы ие
SFX j я елы ия
SFX j е едлы ие
SFX j я едлы ия
SFX j е езлы ие
SFX j я езлы ия
SFX j е мылы ие
SFX j я мылы ия
SFX j е дылы ие
SFX j я дылы ия
SFX j е зылы ие
SFX j я зылы ия
SFX j е тэк ие
SFX j я тэк ия
SFX j е етэк ие
SFX j я етэк ия
SFX j е едтэк ие
SFX j я едтэк ия
SFX j е езтэк ие
SFX j я езтэк ия
SFX j е мытэк ие
SFX j я мытэк ия
SFX j 0 мытэк .
SFX j е дытэк ие
SFX j я дытэк ия
SFX j е зытэк ие
SFX j я зытэк ия
SFX j 0 я .
SFX j 0 ея .
SFX j 0 едъя .
SFX j 0 езъя .
SFX j 0 мыя .
SFX j 0 дыя .
SFX j 0 зыя .
SFX j е ен ие
SFX j я ен ия
SFX j е еным ие
SFX j я еным ия
SFX j е енымы ие
SFX j я енымы ия
SFX j е еныд ие
SFX j я еныд ия
SFX j е еныды ие
SFX j я еныды ия
SFX j е еныз ие
SFX j я еныз ия
SFX j е енызы ие
SFX j я енызы ия		
SFX j е ын ие   #местн.п. + входн.п.
SFX j я ын ия
SFX j е ям ие
SFX j я ям ия
SFX j е ямы ие
SFX j я ямы ия
SFX j е яд ие
SFX j я яд ия
SFX j е яды ие
SFX j я яды ия
SFX j е яз ие
SFX j я яз ия
SFX j е язы ие
SFX j я язы ия
SFX j е ысь ие #исходн.п.
SFX j я ысь ия 
SFX j е ысьтым ие
SFX j я ысьтым ия
SFX j е ысьтымы ие
SFX j я ысьтымы ия
SFX j е ысьтыд ие
SFX j я ысьтыд ия
SFX j е ысьтыды ие
SFX j я ысьтыды ия
SFX j е ысьтыз ие
SFX j я ысьтыз ия
SFX j е ысьтызы ие
SFX j я ысьтызы ия
SFX j е ысен ие #отдал.п.
SFX j я ысен ия 
SFX j е ысеным ие
SFX j я ысеным ия
SFX j е ысеныд ие
SFX j я ысеныд ия
SFX j е ысеныз ие
SFX j я ысеныз ия
SFX j е етӥ ие #перех.п.
SFX j я етӥ ия 
SFX j е етӥм ие
SFX j я етӥм ия
SFX j е етӥд ие
SFX j я етӥд ия 
SFX j е етӥз ие
SFX j я етӥз ия
SFX j е етӥмы ие
SFX j я етӥмы ия 
SFX j е етӥды ие
SFX j я етӥды ия
SFX j е етӥзы ие
SFX j я етӥзы ия 
SFX j е елань ие #направ.п.
SFX j я елань ия
SFX j е едлань ие
SFX j я едлань ия
SFX j е езлань ие
SFX j я езлань ия
SFX j е мылань ие
SFX j я мылань ия
SFX j е дылань ие
SFX j я дылань ия 
SFX j е зылань ие
SFX j я зылань ия 
SFX j е озь ие #предельн.п.
SFX j я озь ия
SFX j е еозь ие
SFX j я еозь ия
SFX j я едозь ия 
SFX j е едозь ие
SFX j е езозь ие
SFX j я езозь ия
SFX j е озям ие
SFX j я озям ия
SFX j е озяд ие
SFX j я озяд ия
SFX j е озяз ие
SFX j я озяз ия
SFX j е мыозь ие
SFX j я мыозь ия
SFX j е дыозь ие
SFX j я дыозь ия
SFX j е зыозь ие
SFX j я зыозь ия
SFX j е ос ие # МН.ч. им.п.
SFX j я ос ия
SFX j е ос ие
SFX j я ос ия
SFX j е осы ие
SFX j я осы ия
SFX j е осыд ие
SFX j я осыд ия
SFX j е осыз ие
SFX j я осыз ия
SFX j е осмы ие
SFX j я осмы ия
SFX j е осты ие
SFX j я осты ия
SFX j е оссы ие
SFX j я оссы ия
SFX j е осме ие
SFX j я осме ия
SFX j е осмес ие
SFX j я осмес ия
SFX j е остэ ие
SFX j я остэ ия
SFX j е остэс ие
SFX j я остэс ия
SFX j е оссэ ие
SFX j я оссэ ия
SFX j е оссэс ие
SFX j я оссэс ия
SFX j е ослэн ие
SFX j я ослэн ия
SFX j е осылэн ие
SFX j я осылэн ия
SFX j е осыдлэн ие
SFX j я осыдлэн ия
SFX j е осызлэн ие
SFX j я осызлэн ия
SFX j е осмылэн ие
SFX j я осмылэн ия
SFX j е остылэн ие
SFX j я остылэн ия
SFX j е оссылэн ие
SFX j я оссылэн ия
SFX j е ослэсь ие
SFX j я ослэсь ия
SFX j е осылэсь ие
SFX j я осылэсь ия
SFX j е осыдлэсь ие
SFX j я осыдлэсь ия
SFX j е осызлэсь ие
SFX j я осызлэсь ия
SFX j е осмылэсь ие
SFX j я осмылэсь ия
SFX j е остылэсь ие
SFX j я остылэсь ия
SFX j е оссылэсь ие
SFX j я оссылэсь ия
SFX j е ослы ие
SFX j я ослы ия
SFX j е осылы ие
SFX j я осылы ия
SFX j е осыдлы ие
SFX j я осыдлы ия
SFX j е осызлы ие
SFX j я осызлы ия
SFX j е осмылы ие
SFX j я осмылы ия
SFX j е остылы ие
SFX j я остылы ия
SFX j е оссылы ие
SFX j я оссылы ия
SFX j е остэк ие
SFX j я остэк ия
SFX j е осытэк ие
SFX j я осытэк ия
SFX j е осыдтэк ие
SFX j я осыдтэк ия
SFX j е осызтэк ие
SFX j я осызтэк ия
SFX j е осмытэк ие
SFX j я осмытэк ия
SFX j е остытэк ие
SFX j я остытэк ия
SFX j е оссытэк ие
SFX j я оссытэк ия
SFX j е осъя ие
SFX j я осъя ия
SFX j е осыя ие
SFX j я осыя ия
SFX j е осыдъя ие
SFX j я осыдъя ия
SFX j е осызъя ие
SFX j я осызъя ия
SFX j е осмыя ие
SFX j я осмыя ия
SFX j е остыя ие
SFX j я остыя ия
SFX j е оссыя ие
SFX j я оссыя ия
SFX j е осын ие
SFX j я осын ия
SFX j е осыным ие
SFX j я осыным ия
SFX j е осынымы ие
SFX j я осынымы ия
SFX j е осыныд ие
SFX j я осыныд ия
SFX j е осыныды ие
SFX j я осыныды ия
SFX j е осыныз ие
SFX j я осыныз ия
SFX j е осынызы ие
SFX j я осынызы ия
SFX j е осам ие
SFX j я осам ия
SFX j е осамы ие
SFX j я осамы ия
SFX j е осад ие
SFX j я осад ия
SFX j е осады ие
SFX j я осады ия
SFX j е осаз ие
SFX j я осаз ия
SFX j е осазы ие
SFX j я осазы ия
SFX j е осысь ие
SFX j я осысь ия
SFX j е осысьтым ие
SFX j я осысьтым ия
SFX j е осысьтымы ие
SFX j я осысьтымы ия
SFX j е осысьтыд ие
SFX j я осысьтыд ия
SFX j е осысьтыды ие
SFX j я осысьтыды ия
SFX j е осысьтыз ие
SFX j я осысьтыз ия
SFX j е осысьтызы ие
SFX j я осысьтызы ия
SFX j е осысен ие
SFX j я осысен ия
SFX j е осысеным ие
SFX j я осысеным ия
SFX j е осысенымы ие
SFX j я осысенымы ия
SFX j е осысеныд ие
SFX j я осысеныд ия
SFX j е осысеныды ие
SFX j я осысеныды ия
SFX j е осысеныз ие
SFX j я осысеныз ия
SFX j е осысенызы ие
SFX j я осысенызы ия
SFX j е осэтӥ ие
SFX j я осэтӥ ия
SFX j е остӥ ие
SFX j я остӥ ия
SFX j е остӥм ие
SFX j я остӥм ия
SFX j е остӥмы ие
SFX j я остӥмы ия
SFX j е остӥд ие
SFX j я остӥд ия
SFX j е остӥды ие
SFX j я остӥды ия
SFX j е остӥз ие
SFX j я остӥз ия
SFX j е остӥзы ие
SFX j я остӥзы ия
SFX j е ослань ие
SFX j я ослань ия
SFX j е осылань ие
SFX j я осылань ия
SFX j е осыдлань ие
SFX j я осыдлань ия
SFX j е осызлань ие
SFX j я осызлань ия
SFX j е осмылань ие
SFX j я осмылань ия
SFX j е остылань ие
SFX j я остылань ия
SFX j е оссылань ие
SFX j я оссылань ия
SFX j е осозь ие
SFX j я осозь ия
SFX j е осыозь ие
SFX j я осыозь ия
SFX j е осыдозь ие
SFX j я осыдозь ия
SFX j е осызозь ие
SFX j я осызозь ия
SFX j е осмыозь ие
SFX j я осмыозь ия
SFX j е остыозь ие
SFX j я остыозь ия
SFX j е оссыозь ие
SFX j я оссыозь ия
SFX j е осозям ие
SFX j я осозям ия
SFX j е осозямы ие
SFX j я осозямы ия
SFX j е осозяд ие
SFX j я осозяд ия
SFX j е осозяды ие
SFX j я осозяды ия
SFX j е осозяз ие
SFX j я осозяз ия
SFX j е осозязы ие
SFX j я осозязы ия
